Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1704.04
Sheriff; deputies; compensation.

The county board shall furnish the sheriff with such deputies as it shall deem necessary and fix the compensation of such deputies who shall be paid by warrant drawn on the general fund.

Laws 1907, c. 54, § 2, p. 228;

Laws 1911, c. 50, § 1, p. 233;

R.S.1913, § 2443;

Laws 1917, c. 44, § 1, p. 124;

Laws 1919, c. 81, § 1, p. 203;

Laws 1921, c. 114, § 1, p. 396;

C.S.1922, § 2383;

Laws 1923, c. 83, § 1, p. 224;

Laws 1927, c. 121, § 1, p. 334;

C.S.1929, § 32-122;

Laws 1943, c. 90, § 20, p. 306;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 33-118;

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 8.

County board is given the right to determine number of deputies a sheriff may employ. Grace v. County of Douglas, 178 Neb. 690, 134 N.W.2d 818 (1965).

The county board has the authority to determine the number of deputies to be appointed by the sheriff and to fix their compensation but the sheriff retains the power to appoint his deputies. State ex rel. Rohrs v. Harris, 100 Neb. 745, 161 N.W. 253 (1917).

A sheriff who does not elect to act as jailer in person, but who deputizes the persons who perform the duties of jailer, such persons being compensated in the manner provided by this section, is not entitled to the compensation provided for a sheriff acting as jailer. Dunkel v. Hall County, 89 Neb. 585, 131 N.W. 973 (1911).